Wisconsin, session 2025, SB522.
do enact as follows:SB522,11Section 1. 767.407 (1) (bm) of the statutes is created to read:SB522,2,52767.407 (1) (bm) In any action affecting the family where a petition has been 3filed for reasonable visitation rights under s. 767.43, the court may appoint a 4guardian ad litem for a minor child. In any such filing, the court shall appoint a 5guardian ad litem if the petitioner has pled a prima facie case for visitation.SB522,26Section 2. Initial applicability.SB522,2,87(1) This act first applies to a petition filed for reasonable visitation rights 8under s. 767.43 on the effective date of this subsection.SB522,2,99